Massachusetts, session 194th, H3449.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 84 of chapter 179 of the acts of 2022 is hereby amended in
subsection (c) by striking out, in the first and seventh instance, the figure “10” and inserting in
place thereof in each instance the following figure:- 20.
SECTION 2. Said subsection (c) is hereby further amended by striking the second
sentence and inserting in place thereof the following new text:-
No city or town shall apply for acceptance into the demonstration project until it has
received local approval as defined in subsection (a) of Section 84 of this act or has submitted a
home rule petition to the general court on the subject matter of this section; provided, that the
department shall issue approvals under this section to not more than 20 applications in the order
in which cities and towns have submitted or submit applications; provided further, that the
department shall, in the interest of increasing housing production in the commonwealth, withhold
approval of an application by a city or town applying to participate in the demonstration project
of 2

until such time as said city or town has: (i) met the 10 per cent housing affordability threshold set
under chapter 40B of the General Laws or has been granted safe harbor status through an
approved Housing Production Plan by the department of housing and community development;
or (ii) has approved a zoning ordinance or by-law that provides for at least 1 district of
reasonable size in which multi-family housing is permitted as of right; provided, that such multi-
family housing shall be without age restrictions and shall be suitable for families with children;
provided further, that a city or town that met the 10 per cent affordability threshold as of
December 21, 2020, shall be deemed to have satisfied the requirements of this paragraph.
SECTION 3. Said subsection (c) is hereby further amended by striking out, in the last
sentence, the following words:- “of home rule petitions to the general court”
SECTION 4. The department of energy resources, in consultation with the executive
office of energy and environmental affairs and the executive office of housing and economic
development, may promulgate regulations to implement this section. Said regulations shall be
promulgated no later than July 1, 2026.
of 2